Wyoming, session 2026, SF0033.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 22-4-101(b) is amended to read:

22-4-101. Application; composition, election and
qualifications of county central committees; certificate of
election.

(b) The county central committee of each political
party consists of precinct committeemen and committeewomen
SF0033

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0185
elected in the county at the regular biennial primary
election and of any other party officials provided by the
bylaws of the party who have been certified and recorded by
the secretary of state under W.S. 22-4-120. Except as
provided in subsection (c) of this section, each political
party in each precinct shall elect one (1) committeeman and
one (1) committeewoman for each two hundred fifty (250)
votes or major fraction thereof cast for the party's
candidate for representative in congress in the last
general election, but provided that no precinct shall be
entitled to less than one (1) precinct committeeman and
precinct committeewoman. Precinct committeemen and
committeewomen shall be electors registered in the party
and resident in the precinct. If a precinct boundary line
is changed for any reason, the county commissioners shall
determine the number of precinct committeemen and
committeewomen to which the affected precinct is entitled.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0033